Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2915
Physical therapy aide, defined.

Physical therapy aide means a person who is trained under the direction of a physical therapist and who performs treatment-related and non-treatment-related tasks.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 133;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1,377;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1008.